Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2710
Intentional misuse of act; disciplinary action.

No employee shall intentionally misuse the State Government Effectiveness Act. Intentional misuse shall include frivolous use, attempts to treat a personnel grievance as an allegation of wrongdoing, and repeated attempts to use such procedures to obtain a resolution of views that do not satisfy the criteria prescribed in subdivision (5) of section 81-2703 for allegations of wrongdoing. The Public Counsel or official may report to the agency any employee found by the Public Counsel or official to have intentionally misused the act, and such employee may be subject to such disciplinary action as is deemed appropriate by the director or chief operating officer of the employee's agency.

Laws 1993, LB 44, § 10.